Nebraska, session 109, LB34.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB34 LB34
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 32-908, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-908 (1) At all elections in the area of this state lying within
the mountain Mountain Standard or Mountain Daylight time zone, the polls
shall open at 7 a.m. and close at 7 p.m. of the same day, and in the area
lying within the central Central Standard or Central Daylight time zone,
the polls shall open at 8 a.m. and close at 8 p.m. of the same day.
(2) Except for special elections conducted by mail as provided in
sections 32-952 to 32-959, the deadline for the receipt of ballots is 7
p.m. on the day set for the election in the area lying within the
mountain Mountain Standard or Mountain Daylight time zone and 8 p.m. on
the day set for the election in the area lying within the central Central
Standard or Central Daylight time zone.
(3) If the judges and clerks of election are not present at the
polls at the required hour, the polls may be opened by those placed in
charge of the polling place at any time before the time required for
closing the polls on election day.
(4) If at the hour of closing there are any persons desiring to vote
who are in the polling place or in a line at the polling place and who
have not been able to vote since appearing at the polling place, the
polls shall be kept open reasonably long enough after the hour for
closing to allow those present at that hour to vote. No person arriving
after the hour when the polls have officially closed shall be entitled to
vote.
Sec. 2. Section 49-1301, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
49-1301 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
the The standard time of the State of Nebraska shall be the time
established by the Uniform Time Act of 1966 in both the central Central
and mountain Rocky Mountain time zones.
(2)(a) The standard time for the State of Nebraska shall be, in the
-2-

LB34 LB34
2025 2025
central time zone, the Coordinated Universal Time minus five hours and,
in the mountain time zone, the Coordinated Universal Time minus six
hours.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, Coordinated Universal Time
means the time scale maintained through the General Conference of Weights
and Measures and interpreted or modified for the United States by the
United States Secretary of Commerce in coordination with the United
States Secretary of the Navy.
(c) This subsection becomes operative on the first Sunday in
November after (i) the provisions of this subsection are authorized by
the laws of the United States or any order of the United States Secretary
of Transportation or are no longer in conflict with the laws of the
United States or any order of the United States Secretary of
Transportation and (ii) three states adjacent to this state adopt laws
for a single year-round standard of time.
Sec. 3. Section 49-1302, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
49-1302 (1) Daylight saving time for the State of Nebraska shall be
in effect from the second first Sunday in March April until the first
last Sunday in November October of each year at such clock time as is
prescribed in the Uniform Time Act of 1966.
(2) This section becomes null and void upon subsection (2) of
section 49-1301 becoming operative.
Sec. 4. Section 81-1323, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1323 The sick leave account shall be balanced as of 11:59 p.m.
central time Central Standard Time on December 31 each calendar year.
Sick leave shall be cumulative for not more than one thousand four
hundred forty hours.
Sec. 5. Section 81-1328, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-3-

LB34 LB34
2025 2025
81-1328 (1) State employees shall, during each year of continuous
employment, be entitled to ninety-six working hours of vacation leave
with full pay.
(2) State employees who complete five years of continuous employment
by the state shall be entitled to one hundred twenty hours of vacation
leave during their sixth year of employment and shall thereafter be
entitled to eight additional hours of vacation leave with full pay for
each additional year of continuous state employment up to a maximum of
two hundred hours of vacation leave a year. Vacation leave shall be
earned in accordance with the following schedule:
During 1st year of continuous employment ......... 96 hours per year
During 2nd year of continuous employment ......... 96 hours per year
During 3rd year of continuous employment ......... 96 hours per year
During 4th year of continuous employment ......... 96 hours per year
During 5th year of continuous employment ......... 96 hours per year
During 6th year of continuous employment ......... 120 hours per
year
During 7th year of continuous employment ......... 128 hours per
year
During 8th year of continuous employment ......... 136 hours per
year
During 9th year of continuous employment ......... 144 hours per
year
During 10th year of continuous employment ........ 152 hours per
year
During 11th year of continuous employment ........ 160 hours per
year
During 12th year of continuous employment ........ 168 hours per
year
During 13th year of continuous employment ........ 176 hours per
year
-4-

LB34 LB34
2025 2025
During 14th year of continuous employment ........ 184 hours per
year
During 15th year of continuous employment ........ 192 hours per
year
During 16th year of continuous employment ........ 200 hours per
year
After 16th year of continuous employment ......... 200 hours per
year
(3) State employees who are regularly employed less than forty hours
a week shall be entitled to vacation leave proportionate to their regular
workweek. Any state employee who has been employed by the Legislature or
Legislative Council shall, for vacation leave entitlement purposes, be
credited with one continuous year of employment for each two hundred
sixty working days such state employee was employed by the Legislature or
Legislative Council.
(4) As used in this section, state employee shall mean any person or
officer employed by the state including the head of any department or
agency, except when such a head is a board or commission, and who works a
full-time or part-time schedule on an ongoing basis.
(5) For purposes of this section, a state employee who has
terminated employment with the state for any reason other than
disciplinary and who returns to state employment within one year from the
date of termination shall have his or her service for vacation leave
entitlement computed by combining prior continuous service with current
continuous service disregarding the period of absence, except that a
state employee who has retired or voluntarily terminated in lieu of
retirement shall, if he or she returns to state employment, be considered
a new state employee for the purpose of vacation leave entitlement.
(6) The vacation leave account of each state employee shall be
balanced as of 11:59 p.m. central time Central Standard Time on December
31 each calendar year. Each state employee shall be entitled to have
-5-

LB34 LB34
2025 2025
accumulated as of such time the number of hours of vacation leave which
he or she earned during that calendar year. Hours of vacation leave
accumulated in excess of that number shall be forfeited. Any state
employee shall be entitled to use any vacation time as soon as it has
accrued. Any vacation time not used within one calendar year following
the calendar year during which the time accrued shall be forfeited. In
special and meritorious cases, when to limit the annual leave to the
period therein specified would work a peculiar hardship, such leave may
be extended in the discretion of the Governor, or in situations involving
employees of the Legislature, in the discretion of the Executive Board of
the Legislative Council.
(7) It is the responsibility of the head of an employing agency to
provide reasonable opportunity for a state employee to use rather than
forfeit accumulated vacation leave. If a state employee makes a
reasonable written request to use vacation leave before the leave must be
forfeited under this section and the employing agency denies the request,
the employing agency shall pay the state employee the cash equivalent of
the amount of forfeited vacation leave that was requested and denied.
Such cash payment shall be made within thirty days after the requested
and denied vacation leave is forfeited under this section. Such cash
payment shall be considered compensation for purposes of a state
employee's retirement benefit in a defined contribution or cash balance
benefit plan administered by the Public Employees Retirement Board but
shall not be considered compensation for purposes of a state employee's
retirement benefit in any other defined benefit plan administered by the
Public Employees Retirement Board. In determining whether a state
employee’s request to use vacation leave is reasonable, the employing
agency shall consider the amount of vacation leave requested, the number
of days remaining prior to forfeiture during which the state employee may
take vacation leave, the amount of notice given to the employing agency
prior to the requested vacation leave, any effects on public safety, and
-6-

LB34 LB34
2025 2025
other relevant factors. This subsection shall not apply to state
employees who are exempt from the State Personnel System pursuant to
subdivisions (1)(g) and (h) of section 81-1316.
(8) Each state employee, upon retirement, dismissal, or voluntary
separation from state employment, shall be paid for unused accumulated
vacation leave. Upon the death of a state employee, the his or her
beneficiary of the state employee shall be paid for unused accumulated
vacation leave.
(9) A permanent state employee who is transferred from one agency to
another shall have his or her accrued vacation leave transferred to the
receiving agency.
(10) The Director of Personnel shall adopt and promulgate such rules
and regulations as are necessary to administer this section.
Sec. 6. Original sections 49-1301, 49-1302, 81-1323, and 81-1328,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and section 32-908, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-7-